orthographica/firefox-thunderbird/kab.aff
# Same as m but cross-product and used in circumfix for participle. Internal only.
PFX p Y 15
PFX p 0 i/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p 0 i/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p 0 ye/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p 0 ye/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p 0 y/X [aiu] is:azwirnumaɣun
PFX p e i/X e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p e i/X e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p e ye/X e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p e ye/X e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p e ye/X e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p 0 i/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p 0 i/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p e i/X e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p e i/X e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
PFX p e i/X e[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_n_umaɣun
# 5 last in each case (/X and without) are iCC alternative for the yeCC verb conditions - with and without e dropping.

# 3rd person feminine singular, and t prefix for other persons (internal - circumfix)
PFX u N 9
PFX u 0 t [aiu] is:udem3untiasuf
PFX u 0 t [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:udem3ntsf
PFX u 0 t [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:udem3ntsf
PFX u 0 te [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3ntsf
PFX u 0 te [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3ntsf
PFX u e t [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:udem3ntsf
PFX u e t [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:udem3ntsf
PFX u e te [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3ntsf
PFX u e te [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem3ntsf

# Like u but internal,  t prefix for other persons (circumfix)
PFX P Y 9
PFX P 0 t/X [aiu] is:azwir_t
PFX P 0 t/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:azwir_t
PFX P 0 t/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:azwir_t
PFX P 0 te/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_t
PFX P 0 te/X [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_t
PFX P e t/X [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:azwir_t
PFX P e t/X [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:azwir_t
PFX P e te/X [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_t
PFX P e te/X [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:azwir_t

# 1st person plural
# May need an exception for n(e)nn here
PFX A N 9
PFX A 0 n [aiu] is:udem1asget
PFX A 0 n [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:udem1sg
PFX A 0 n [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:udem1sg
PFX A 0 ne [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem1sg
PFX A 0 ne [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem1sg
PFX A e n [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:udem1sg
PFX A e n [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:udem1sg
PFX A e ne [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem1sg
PFX A e ne [e][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:udem1sg

# Participles
SFX x Y 2
SFX x 0 n/pX [aiu] is:amaɣun
SFX x 0 en/pX [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:amaɣun

# Amyag n tɣara, participle, suffix only.
SFX z N 2
SFX z 0 n [aiu] is:amaɣun
SFX z 0 en [bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛʷ˚] is:amaɣun

# NOUNS

# Soft i CS prefix - visibility internal
# Allow for ye being pronounced i even with a double consonant, and allow this i (and a single consonant i) to be written yi
# Xprod to allow X. Could split a and ta out into a separate code like q and drop X and Xprod. But ta and a won't match i.
PFX y Y 30
PFX y a i/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y a i/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y a yi/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y a yi/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y a ye/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y a ye/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y a i/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y a i/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y a yi/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y a yi/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i i i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i i i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i yi i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i yi i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i ye i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i ye i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i i i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i i i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i yi i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y i yi i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta i/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta i/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta yi/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta yi/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][aiue] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta ye/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta ye/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta i/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta i/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta yi/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX y ta yi/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
# Last 10 * for deriving masculine. Same relaxed rules for pronouncing/writing i and writing yi

# Strong i nouns - to use with singular and plural
PFX Y Y 1
PFX Y 0 y i is:addad_amaruz

# What to do with i8allen in .dic - soft i but listed as full word, not as regular pl.
# Can render i as yi in writing, purely orthographically?

# * are rules that derive one gender from the other. Only done for ta/a prefixed nouns.

# Last 3 * as circumfix (with final t drop)
# Xprod to allow X. If matches circumfix and ta, won't match a as well. Could split ta out into
# internal code like q.
PFX w Y 6
PFX w a we a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX w a we a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX w a u a is:addad_amaruz
PFX w ta we/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX w ta we/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX w ta u/X ta is:addad_amaruz
