orthographica/firefox-thunderbird/kab.dic
igersaffen/yY
ibenduyar/y st:abendayer is:asget
iberriq/yY po:isem
ablaḍ/wN po:isem
icbayliyen/y st:acbayli is:asget
icecfeḍ/yY po:isem
ttcedhi/xacmuACDMUGHF st:cedhi is:urmir_ussid
ceṛṛeɛ/muA po:amyag
acraḍ/w po:isem
ddukkl/xacmuACDMU st:ddallel is:izri is:flipped
idel/yY po:isem
idfiren/y st:adfir is:asget
dhec/muA po:amyag
idenyen/yY st:idni is:asget
aḍamu/w po:isem
ḍɣu/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
ifeɣ/yY po:isem
ifirellas/yY st:ifirelles is:asget
afjuṛ/wN po:isem
fessed/muA st:fsed is:urmir_ussid
ttagar/xacmuACDMUGHF st:agar is:urmir_ussid
igenwan/yY st:igenni is:asget
igmir/yY po:isem
aǧḥiḥ/wN po:isem
ḥemm/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ḥemmem is:flippedAoristAlt2
ttḥemmiṛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ḥemmeṛ is:urmir_ussid
ḥnin/zadfg st:iḥnin is:izri
ijaguten/y st:ajagu is:asget
ijileq/yY po:isem
ttejji/xacmuACDMUGHF st:jji is:urmir_ussid
akanar/wN po:isem
kerrb/xacmuACDMUGHF st:kerreb is:flippedAorist
ilelli/yY po:arbib
ilemẓiyen/yY st:ilemẓi is:asget
ttleḥḥim/xacmuACDMUGHF st:lḥem is:urmir_ussid
lqay/zadfg st:alqay is:izri
amaswaḍ/wN po:isem
imceṛceṛ/yY po:isem
imceṛceṛ/yY po:arbib
ttimellik/xacmuACDMUGHF st:mellek is:urmir_ussid
imerqed/yY po:isem
amerẓu/w po:isem
imeɣṛi/yY po:isem
imiẓid/yY po:arbib
imiɛraf/yY st:imiɛruf is:asget
mellul/zadfg st:imlul is:izri
emrebbaɛn/xacmuACDMUGHF st:mrebbeɛ is:flippedUrmirUssid
mɣulln/zadfg st:mɣull is:izri is:flipped
yemsenɣ/zadfg st:msenɣ is:izri is:flippedFromParticiple
imserri/yY po:arbib
amuṭṭiḍ/wN po:arbib
imẓabiyen/y st:amẓabi is:asget
neǧǧes/muA st:nǧes is:urmir_ussid
neǧǧɛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:nǧeɛ is:flippedUrmirUssid
inigi/yY po:isem
ipapasen/y st:apappas is:asget
aqeddac/wN po:isem
iqeḥb/zadfg st:qeḥḥeb is:izri is:flippedFromParticiple
qis/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
qqaṭṭr/xacmuACDMU st:qqiṭṭer is:izri is:flipped
qelb/xacmuACDMUGHF st:qleb is:flippedAorist
irektiyen/y st:arekti is:asget
yurw/zadfg st:arew is:izri is:flippedFromParticiple
iri/yY po:isem
ṛgiǧif/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ṛgiǧef is:urmir_ussid
ṛǧim/VacmuACDMU st:ṛǧem is:izri_ibaw
aɣelmi/w po:isem
ɣlay/zadfg st:aɣlay is:izri
iɣrisen/yY po:isem is:asget
isuḍaf/y st:asaḍef is:asget
ssalqaf/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ssalqef is:urmir_ussid is:substituted
sebbɛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:sebbeɛ is:flippedAorist
seblaɛ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:sebleɛ is:urmir_ussid
sqecr/xacmuACDMUGHF st:seqcer is:flippedAorist
sserbḥ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:sserbeḥ is:flippedAoristNZ
serfed/muA po:amyag
aseɣwen/w po:isem
sihrw/xacmuACDMUGHF st:sihrew is:flippedAoristNZ
ttsiḥ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:siḥ is:urmir_ussid
isir/yY po:isem
saɣezf/xacmuACDMU st:siɣzef is:izri is:flipped
tesmett/zadfg st:smett is:izri
smeɛql/xacmuACDMUGHF st:smeɛqel is:flippedAoristNZ
ttismiḍ/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ismiḍ is:urmir_ussid
isert/zadfg st:sret is:izri is:flippedFromParticiple
isɣi/yY po:isem
ssukk/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag is:substitutedFromAorist
ssusru/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag is:substitutedFromAorist
sutr/xacmuACDMUGHF st:suter is:flippedAorist
ttiweɛɛid/xacmuACDMUGHF st:weɛɛed is:urmir_ussid
wehhm/xacmuACDMUGHF st:whem is:flippedUrmirUssid
wessiɛ/zadfg st:iwsiɛ is:izri
iweṭḍen/yY st:iwṭeḍ is:asget
axeṛfi/w po:isem
ttxeṛṛif/xacmuACDMUGHF st:xeṛṛef is:urmir_ussid
izmawen/yY st:izem is:asget
zellz/xacmuACDMUGHF st:zlez is:flippedUrmirUssid
zmeḍ/muA po:amyag
zrir/zadfg st:izrir is:izri
aẓayer/w po:isem
iẓiwec/yY po:isem
iɛeqliyen/y st:aɛeqli is:asget
ɛac/VxacmuACDMU st:ɛic is:izri
ɛeǧǧl/xacmuACDMUGHF st:ɛjel is:flippedUrmirUssid
ɛkis/VacmuACDMU st:ɛkes is:izri_ibaw
ɛziz/zadfg st:iɛziz is:izri
adebli/wt po:arbib
ambiddel/w po:isem
aɣlad/w po:isem
rxay/zadfg st:arxay
aweḥdani/wt po:arbib
iweḥdaniyen/y st:aweḥdani is:asget
fehhem/xacmuACDMUGHF st:fhem
fessi/xacmuACDMUGHF st:fsi
gezm/VxacACDMUGHF st:gzem
bnin/zadfg st:ibnin is:izri
leggaɣ/zadfg st:ilwiɣ
meẓẓiy/zadfg st:imẓi is:izri
rqiq/zadfg st:irqiq
werraɣ/xzadfg st:iwriɣ
zeggaɣ/zadfg st:izwiɣ is:izri
iẓiwec/y po:isem
ɣil/xacmuACDMUGHF po:amyag
qummec/muA po:amyag
sǧuǧǧeg/muA po:amyag is:aswaɣ
suji/xacmuACMUGHF po:amyag is:aswaɣ
tbiɛ/VxacmuACDMU st:tbeɛ
ataram/w po:isem
sṭeɛṭiɛ/VxacmuCDMU st:sṭeɛṭeɛ is:izri
asqecmeɛ/w po:isem
